District of Columbia statutes.
25-209

Community resource officer.

The Director shall appoint an employee to be a community resource officer, who shall serve as the primary contact for members of the community, both residents and businesses, wishing to submit complaints or to protest a license. The community resource officer shall provide information to citizens and the business community about the license application process, qualifications, complaint or protest process, and the citizen’s or businesses’ responsibilities and options in each step of the process.

History

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959